Rhode Island statutes. Title 35 Public Finance
Chapter 7 Post Audit of Accounts

35-7-1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 55; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

35-7-1

; Repealed by P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 8, effective June 24, 2016. For comparable provisions, see §

35-7.1-1

et seq.

35-7-2.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 13; P.L. 1936, ch. 2335, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 55; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

35-7-2

; Repealed by P.L. 2009, ch. 294, § 1, effective November 13, 2009.

35-7-3.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2187, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 55; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

35-7-3

; P.L. 1979, ch. 274, § 1; P.L. 1989, ch. 46, § 1; P.L. 2009, ch. 294, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 8, effective June 24, 2016. For comparable provisions, see §

35-7.1-1

et seq.

35-7-3.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 294, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 8, effective June 24, 2016. For comparable provisions, see §

35-7.1-2

.

35-7-4.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2187, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 55; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

35-7-4

; P.L. 1979, ch. 274, § 1; P.L. 1996, ch. 100, art. 4, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 2009, ch. 294, § 1, effective November 13, 2009.

35-7-5.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2187, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 55; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

35-7-5

; P.L. 2009, ch. 294, § 2; Repealed by P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 8, effective June 24, 2016. For comparable provisions, see §

35-7.1-3

.

35-7-5.1.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 2009, ch. 294, § 3; Repealed by P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 8, effective June 24, 2016. For comparable provisions, see §

35-7.1-4

.

35-7-6.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1896, ch. 34, § 34; P.L. 1901, ch. 809, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 44, § 35; P.L. 1922, ch. 2200, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 45, § 35; P.L. 1923, ch. 468, § 1; P.L. 1929, ch. 1349, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 55; G.L. 1956, §

35-7-6

; Repealed by P.L. 1979, ch. 274, § 1.

35-7-7.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 55; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

35-7-7

; Repealed by P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 8, effective June 24, 2016. For comparable provisions, see §

35-7.1-1

et seq.

35-7-8.
Access of director to state property — Assistance to other departments.

For the purpose of making any investigation authorized by §§

35-7-1

—

35-7-9

, the director of administration or his or her duly authorized agent may enter upon any state property at any reasonable time. The director, upon request by the proper person, shall assist, so far as practicable, any state department or agency in the keeping of its accounts and financial records and the drawing of contracts and agreements, and may generally advise that person concerning the financial affairs and management of the department or agency.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2187, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 55; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

35-7-8

.

35-7-9.
Repealed.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 7, § 55; G.L. 1956, §

35-7-9

; Repealed by P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 1985.

35-7-10.
Audit provided for by finance committee of house.

It shall be the duty of the finance committee of the house of representatives to provide annually for a complete post audit of the financial transactions and accounts of the state. The finance committee of the house of representatives shall be required to utilize the services of the auditor general to perform the post audit. The post audit shall commence as soon as possible after the close of each fiscal year and shall include the examination of all accounts from the date of the last post audit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 74; P.L. 1952, ch. 2974, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

35-7-10

; P.L. 1975, ch. 179, § 1.

35-7-11.
Specifications of audit — Copies of report.

The director of administration and the general treasurer shall assist the finance committee of the house of representatives in determining the post audit specifications prior to the employment of the certified public accountant or accountants. Upon completion of the post audit the certified public accountant or accountants shall submit copies of the report to the members of the finance committee of the house of representatives, the governor, the director of administration, the general treasurer, and the legislative council. The report shall also be made available for public inspection.

History of Section.

P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 74; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

35-7-11

.

35-7-12.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §

35-7-12

; P.L. 1960, ch. 149, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 274, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 1985.

35-7-13.
Audit of quasi-public agencies.

All quasi-public agencies including corporations, authorities, commissions, and boards created by the authority of the general assembly, executive order, or state law, excluding cities and their subdivisions, towns and their subdivisions, regional school districts and school committees, water districts, fire districts, and any other municipal corporations and their agencies, subject to post audit, are hereby required to obtain the approval of the director of administration and the auditor general prior to the employment of private auditors. Audit workpapers of the private auditors shall be made available upon request, at the completion of the audit, to the auditor general and/or the director of administration for their review. The audit report shall be furnished to the auditor general and the director of administration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 27, § 1.

35-7-14.
Travel and entertainment expenses of quasi-public agencies.

Quasi-public agencies, as set forth in §

35-7-13

, shall prepare and maintain documentation for all travel and entertainment expenses in sufficient detail to allow for post audit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 181, art. 27, § 1.

35-7-15.
Audit of information security systems.

The general assembly recognizes that the security of government computer systems is essential to ensuring the stability and integrity of vital information gathered and stored by the government for the benefit of the citizenry and the breach of security over computer systems presents a risk to the health, safety, and welfare of the public. It is the intent of the legislature to ensure that government computer systems and information residing on these systems are protected from unauthorized access, compromise, sabotage, hacking, viruses, destruction, illegal use, cyber attack, or any other act that might jeopardize or harm the computer systems and the information stored on them.

In conjunction with the powers and duties outlined in this chapter, the office of internal audit may conduct reviews and assessments of the various government computer systems and the security systems established to safeguard these computer systems. Computer systems subject to this section shall include systems that pertain to federal, state, or local programs, and quasi-governmental bodies, and the computer systems of any entity or program that is subject to audit by the office of internal audit. The office of internal audit’s review may include an assessment of system vulnerability, network penetration, potential security breaches, and susceptibility to cyber attack and cyber fraud.

The office of internal audit’s findings shall be deemed public records and available for public inspection; provided, however, in the event the review indicates a computer system is vulnerable, or security over the system is otherwise deficient, reasonably segregable portions of the findings shall be subject to public inspection after the redaction of any information, the disclosure of which, would endanger the security of the system or reveal the specific nature of the vulnerabilities found. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the work papers developed in connection with the review of computer systems and the security over those systems authorized by this section shall not be deemed public records and are not subject to disclosure.

In order to maintain the integrity of the computer system, the office of internal audit may procure the services of specialists in information security systems or other contractors deemed necessary in conducting reviews under this section, and in procuring those services shall be exempt from the requirements of the state purchasing law or regulation.

Any outside contractor or vendor hired to provide services in the review of the security of a computer system shall be bound by the confidentiality provisions of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2014, ch. 259, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 317, § 1; P.L. 2016, ch. 142, art. 4, § 9.